Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.56.260

Connection of channel converter.

No person may be charged with theft under RCW 9A.56.220 or subject to a civil cause of action under RCW 9A.56.250 for connecting a nondecoding or nondescrambling channel frequency converter, which includes cable-ready television sets, video recorders, or similar equipment, to a cable system.

[ 1985 c 430 s 5.]

NOTES:

Severability—1985 c 430: See note following RCW 9A.56.220.